New York, session 2025-2026, A5167.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The banking law is amended by adding a new section 96-dd to 2 read as follows: 3 § 96-dd. Banking development district working group. 1. A banking 4 development district working group is hereby established to assess and 5 provide recommendations and future goals for the banking development 6 district program created under section ninety-six-d of this article. 7 The superintendent shall impose an assessment on bank branches located 8 within banking development districts to cover all costs associated with 9 this work group. 10 2. The banking district working group shall include the following 11 individuals or their representatives, the superintendent, the state 12 comptroller, the New York city comptroller, the commissioner of the New 13 York city department of finance, the commissioner of empire state devel- 14 opment, the chair of the senate banks committee, the chair of the senate 15 commerce, economic development and small business committee, the chair 16 of the assembly banks committee and the chair of the banking in under- 17 served communities subcommittee. 18 3. No later than one year after the effective date of this section, 19 the working group shall provide an assessment of the current state of 20 the banking development district program to the governor and the legis- 21 lature, including, but not limited to the following information: 22 a. the number of participating banking development district branches 23 and where such branches are located; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05828-01-5 A. 5167 2 1 b. ways the program is helping to serve the unbanked and underbanked 2 as defined in subdivision one-a of section ninety-six-d of this article; 3 c. the strengths and weaknesses of the program; and 4 d. necessary measures that should be taken to build upon the strengths 5 of the program and eliminate identified weaknesses. 6 4. Annually thereafter, such working group shall continue to provide 7 an assessment of the banking development district program to the gover- 8 nor and the legislature. Along with the information required under 9 subdivision three of this section, such assessment shall provide future 10 goals for the program that shall be incorporated in the upcoming year to 11 continue strengthening such program. 12 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 96-d of the banking law is amended by 13 adding a new paragraph (b-1) to read as follows: 14 (b-1) the numbers of unbanked and underbanked individuals within the 15 district; 16 § 3. Section 96-d of the banking law is amended by adding a new subdi- 17 vision 1-a to read as follows: 18 1-a. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 19 the following meanings: 20 a. "unbanked" shall mean an individual not served by an insured insti- 21 tution in any capacity; and 22 b. "underbanked" shall mean an individual with an account at an 23 insured institution but who has obtained alternative, nonbank, financial 24 services in the past twelve months. 25 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 26 deemed repealed 2 years after such date.